furlan.dic
acjadê/BD
aclamâ/A
acolzi/IEGF
acuarzi/IEGF
adusi/ELGF
afanâ/A
aflizi/ELG
alterâ/A
aludi/ELF
ameti/IEF
aneti/IEF
angariâ/A
ardi/IEF
armonizâ/A
ascrivi/ELGF
assisti/IEF
assolvi/IEGF
assumi/IEF
atindi/IEF
augurâ/A
avalê/BD
avierzi/IEGF
azonzi/IEGF
balotâ/A
bati/IEF
becotâ/A
bevi/ELF
blichignâ/A
boli/IEF
broiâ/A
cagâ/A
caramelâ/A
cedi/ELF
cenzi/IEGF
cepelâ/A
cerni/IEF
circoscrivi/ELGF
cjadê/BD
cjalcjâ/A
cjoli/IEG
classificâ/A
cludi/ELF
coincidi/ELF
comendâ/A
cometi/IEF
comovi/ELGF
comparê/BD
competi/IEF
complanzi/IEGF
complasê/BD
componi/IEF
comprimi/IEF
concedi/ELF
concori/IEF
condurâ/A
condusi/ELGF
confondi/IEF
contindi/IEF
continuâ/A
converzi/IEGF
convivi/ELF
conzonzi/IEGF
corezi/ELGF
corodi/ELF
cospetonâ/A
costrenzi/IHEF
cressi/IEF
crodi/ELF
crustinâ/A
cuintribati/IEF
cunvinci/IEF
curiosâ/A
cuvierzi/IEGF
davierzi/IEGF
davoni/IEG
davuelzi/IEGF
decjadi/ELF
decjadê/BD
decorâ/A
dedusi/ELGF
deponi/IEF
descrivi/ELGF
deteriorâ/A
dibati/IEF
difindi/IEF
dimeti/IEF
dipenzi/IEG
dipindi/IEF
direzi/ELGF
disarmâ/A
discerni/IEF
discjadi/ELF
discjadê/BD
discjoli/IEG
discognossi/ELF
discolçâ/A
disconeti/IEF
discori/IEF
discuvierzi/IEGF
disfantâ/A
disfrizi/ELG
disgresâ/A
dislidi/ELF
dismostrâ/A
dismovi/ELGF
disparê/BD
dispersuadê/BD
dispierdi/IEF
dispiticâ/A
displasi/ELF
displasê/BbD
dissindi/IEF
dissiolzi/IEGF
distilâ/A
distinzi/IEGF
distridi/ELF
distruzi/ELGF
distuarzi/IEGF
disvistî/MF
divinizâ/A
diviodi/ELF
divuelzi/IEGF
dumiesteâ/A
ecedi/ELF
ecuivalê/BD
eludi/ELF
emerzi/IEGF
emeti/IEF
esclamâ/A
escludi/ELF
espandi/IEF
esplodi/ELF
estindi/IEF
evadi/ELF
evolvi/IEGF
fagotâ/A
fenzi/IEGF
filetâ/A
finzi/IEGF
fleti/IEF
foropâ/A
fraidessi/ELF
franzi/IEGF
frenzi/IEGF
fridi/ELF
frizi/ELG
frodeâ/A
gaiâ/A
gorghizâ/A
ibridâ/A
imbati/IEF
imbocolâ/A
imerzi/IEGF
impachetâ/A
imparê/BD
impleâ/A
imprimi/IEF
inacuarzi/IEGF
incantesemâ/A
incidi/ELF
incjoli/IEG
incolmenâ/A
incomparê/BD
incressi/ELF
indaviodi/ELF
individuâ/A
indusi/ELGF
infogonâ/A
infondi/IEF
infoti/IEF
ingloti/IEF
ingomeâ/A
inmascarâ/A
inmerzi/IEGF
inscrivi/ELGF
insiorâ/A
insorzi/IEGF
intenzi/IEGF
interogâ/A
intiessi/ELF
intraviodi/ELF
introdusi/ELGF
invadi/ELF
inviolâ/A
involzi/IEGF
iscrivi/ELGF
italianâ/A
jonzi/IEGF
lavoronâ/A
lenzi/IEGF
litigâ/A
madressi/ELF
magonâ/A
malmolzi/IEGF
marcâ/A
menâ/A
molestâ/A
molzi/IEGF
movi/ELGF
muardi/IEF
mungugnâ/A
nivelâ/A
nosê/BD
ocori/IEF
ofindi/IEF
onzi/IEGF
oponi/IEF
oprimi/IEF
origjinâ/A
palpaçâ/A
parê/BbD
patafâ/A
penzi/IEG
perimetrâ/A
permeti/IEF
persuadi/ELF
persuadê/BD
pilustrâ/A
pintî/MF
plasê/BbD
plaçâ/A
poni/IEF
ponzi/IEGF
possedê/BD
postponi/IEF
pratindi/IEF
precisâ/A
predisponi/IEF
preludi/bELF
prescrivi/ELGF
presintî/MF
pressedê/CB
prevalê/BD
previodi/ELF
privâ/A
produsi/ELGF
prometi/IEF
promovi/ELGF
protezi/ELGF
provedi/ELF
prudelâ/A
racolzi/IEGF
ragnâ/A
razonzi/IEGF
razunzi/IEGF
recuperâ/A
redizi/ELF
renzi/IEGF
respinzi/IEGF
rezi/ELGF
ribaltâ/A
ricevi/ELF
ricjadê/BD
ricondusi/ELGF
ricori/IEF
ridusi/ELGF
riessi/ELF
rigjavâ/A
rimovi/ELGF
rinunziâ/A
rionzi/IEGF
ripeti/IEF
riprodusi/ELGF
risolvi/IEGF
risolzi/IEGF
risplendi/IEF
ritratâ/A
rivalê/BD
riviodi/ELF
rivolzi/IEGF
roseâ/A
sacramentâ/A
sarâ/A
sbeletâ/A
sborfinâ/A
sburtâ/A
scjadi/ELF
scjadê/BD
scjaldâ/A
sclopâ/A
scomponi/IEF
sconfizi/ELG
sconvolzi/IEGF
scori/IEF
scovâ/A
scrivi/ELGF
scuarzi/IEGF
scuindi/IEF
scusâ/A
scuvierzi/IEGF
sedusi/ELGF
semifleti/IEF
sestâ/A
sfogâ/A
sfrenzi/IEGF
sgarfâ/A
sgoibâ/A
sielzi/IEGF
simpatizâ/A
siolzi/IEGF
slengonâ/A
slusi/ELF
smaraveâ/A
smovi/ELGF
socombi/IEF
socori/IEF
soflonâ/A
somerzi/IEGF
somierzi/IEGF
soprimi/IEF
sorevivi/ELF
sorprendi/IEF
sotetâ/A
sotindi/IEF
sotintindi/IEF
sotscrivi/ELGF
sozonzi/IEGF
spandi/IEF
sparlenzi/IEGF
speculâ/A
spindi/IEF
splendi/IEF
sploiâ/A
sponzi/IEGF
spuarzi/IEGF
stanziâ/A
stierni/IEF
strafondi/IEF
strafonzi/IEGF
straforâ/A
straponzi/IEGF
stravinci/IEF
stravuelzi/IEGF
straçâ/A
strenzi/IEGF
stuarzi/IEGF
sturbâ/A
suponi/IEF
svalutâ/A
svistî/MF
svuaçâ/A
tapâ/A
tasê/BD
temi/IEF
temê/CB
tenzi/IEGF
terminâ/A
tindi/IEF
tossi/IEF
trabacjâ/A
tradusi/ELGF
trascrivi/ELGF
traslusi/ELF
traviodi/ELF
travuelzi/IEGF
trenâ/A
tuarzi/IEGF
tumiâ/A
ufindi/IEF
valê/BD
variâ/A
vedê/BD
vendi/IEF
vierzi/IEGF
vinci/IEF
viodi/ELF
violâ/A
vuarbâ/A
zemê/CB
zovâ/A
